Hawaii statutes.
§286-104 Which persons shall not be
licensed. The examiner of drivers shall not issue any license to any
person:

(1) Whose license has been suspended by a court of
competent jurisdiction during the suspension period, nor to any person whose
license has been revoked until the expiration of one year after the date of the
revocation, or until the expiration of the period of revocation specified by
law, whichever is greater, except as provided under sections 286-102.6(d) and
286-102.6(e) for suspensions and revocations of a provisional license; nor to
any person who, while unlicensed, has within two years been convicted of
operating a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant or, prior to January 1,
2002, of driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs;

(2) Who is required by this part to take an
examination, unless the person has successfully passed the examination;

(3) Who is required under the motor vehicle financial
responsibility laws of this State to deposit proof of financial responsibility
and who has not deposited the proof;

(4) Who the examiner of drivers has good cause to
believe would not be able to operate a motor vehicle with safety upon the
highways by reason of physical or mental disability;

(5) Who is under eighteen years of age; provided that
a person:

(A) Who is fifteen years and six months of
age may be granted an instruction permit;

(B) Who is at least sixteen and less than
eighteen years of age may be granted a provisional license upon satisfying the
requirements of section 286-102.6;

(C) Who is at least seventeen and less than
eighteen years of age may be granted a license upon satisfying the requirements
of section 286-102.6, which license may be suspended or revoked by a judge
having jurisdiction over the holder of the license. Upon revocation of the
license, the person shall not be eligible to operate a motor vehicle on the
highway until the person is eighteen years of age and has again satisfied the
requirements of sections 286-108 and 286-109; or

(D) Who is an emancipated minor may be
granted a license upon satisfaction of all requirements of this chapter
applicable to persons eighteen years of age or older;

(6) Who is not in compliance with section 286-102.5;
or

(7) Who does not submit proof, satisfactory to the director,
that the applicant's presence in the United States is authorized by federal
law. The director shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 that provide
for standards of proof and for exemptions from this requirement.

Any person denied a license under this or any
other section of this part shall have a right of appeal as provided in section
286-129. [L 1937, c 234, §4; am L 1943, c 121, §1; RL 1945, §7304; am L 1947, c
38, §1; RL 1955, §160-34; am L 1967, c 214, §8; HRS §286-104; am L 1970, c 164,
§3 and c 188, §39; am L 1980, c 54, §1; am L 1985, c 258, §2; gen ch 1985; am L
1990, c 34, §15; am L 1996, c 36, §1; am L 1997, c 153, §1 and c 330, §2; am L
1999, c 175, §1; am L 2001, c 86, §3 and c 157, §6; am L 2002, c 16, §13; am L
2005, c 72, §§3, 15; am L 2010, c 38, §1 and c 85, §2]

Cross References

Development of medical evaluation system and criteria, see
§286-4.1(b).

Statewide driver education program and behind-the-wheel
driver training program; rules, see §286-108.4.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next